errortag-src/subjunction-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ################################## !
!This file contains the Subjunctions !
! ################################## !





! Subjunction
! ===========


LEXICON Subjunction

ahte Cs ;
aht+Use/Sub:aht Cs; !
amas Cs ;
dađe Cs ;
dađi Cs ;
!dahje Cs ; ! CC only (?)
dan% botta% go Cs ;
danin% go Cs ;
daningo Cs ;
danne% go Cs ;
das% go Cs ;
dasgo Cs ;
dasságo Cs ;
!de Cs ; Moved to CC
dego Cs ;
dugo Cs ;
dušše% go Cs ;
duššego Cs ;
!eará% go Cs ; ! Cs takes a clause, "eará go" can take a NP.
earágo Cs ; ! The Cs tag is not ideal, CS is a barrier in many rules.
earetgo Cs ;
!earret% go Cs ;
earretgo Cs ;
ehte Cs ;
!ele% ge Cs ; ! CC only (?)
geardde Cs ;
gearddi Cs ;
go Cs ;
nu% guhkásgo Cs ; ! Deviant, "guhkás go" expected
jes Cs ;
jis Cs ;
joas  Cs ;
!jogo Cs ; ! Moved to adv
jos Cs ;
josba Cs ;
!juogo Cs ; Moved to adv
juos Cs ;
juos% go Cs ;
juosgo Cs ;
jus Cs ;
mađe Cs ;
mađi Cs ;
maŋŋágo+Use/Sub:maŋ'ŋágo Cs ; !
maŋŋágo Cs ;
!maŋŋel% go Cs ;
maŋŋelgo Cs ;
!maŋŋil% go Cs ;
maŋŋilgo Cs ;
!maŋŋá% go Cs ;
mo Cs ; !XXX
mov Cs ; !XXX
movt  Cs ; !XXX
muhte Cs ;
!muhto Cs ; ! CC instead?
nu% ahte Cs ;
nuvt% ahte Cs ;
nugo Cs ;
!ovdal Cs ; ! Pp only without go (?)
ovdal% go Cs ;
ovdalgo Cs ;
plus Cs ;
seammaládjego+Use/Sub:seammaládjego Cs; !
seammáládjego+Use/Sub:seammáládjego Cs; !
seammaláhkaigo+Use/Sub:seammaláhkaigo Cs; !
seammáláhkaigo+Use/Sub:seammáláhkaigo Cs; !
seammaláhkáigo+Use/Sub:seammaláhkáigo Cs; !
seammáláhkáigo+Use/Sub:seammáláhkáigo Cs; !
seammás% go Cs ;
sehke Cs ; !Not in corpus.
!sihke Cs ; ! moved to conj
vái Cs ;
váikko Cs ;
vai Cs ;
vaikke Cs ;
vaikkeba Cs ;
vaikko Cs ;
vaikkoba Cs ;
vuoikke+Use/Sub:vuoikke Cs; !
váikke Cs ;

LEXICON Cs

+CS:%>0 # ;
